Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5816.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 79. An agency, 1 or more members of the agency, a person designated by statute, or 1 or more hearing officers designated and authorized by the agency to handle contested cases , shall be are the presiding officers in a contested cases. Hearings shall case. A contested case hearing must be conducted in an impartial manner and the presiding officers shall conduct the review de novo. On the filing in good faith by a party of a timely and sufficient affidavit of personal bias or disqualification of a presiding officer, the agency shall determine the matter as a part of the record in the case, and its the agency's determination shall be is subject to judicial review at the conclusion of the proceeding. When a presiding officer is disqualified or it is impracticable for him the presiding officer to continue the contested case hearing, another presiding officer may be assigned to continue with the contested case hearing unless it is shown that substantial prejudice to the party will result. therefrom. Sec. 106. (1) Except when a statute or the constitution provides for a different scope of review, the court shall conduct the review de novo and not defer to the agency's decision or order. The court shall hold unlawful and set aside a decision or order of an agency if the substantial rights of the petitioner have been prejudiced because the decision or order is any of the following: (a) In violation of the constitution or a statute. (b) In excess of the statutory authority or jurisdiction of the agency. (c) Made upon on unlawful procedure resulting in material prejudice to a party. (d) Not supported by competent, material, and substantial evidence on the whole record. (e) Arbitrary, capricious, or clearly an abuse or unwarranted exercise of discretion. (f) Affected by other substantial and material error of law. (2) The court, as appropriate, may affirm, reverse, or modify the decision or order or remand the case for further proceedings.